Illinois, session 104th, HB1411.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527-23.7 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-23.7)7    Sec. 27-23.7. Bullying prevention.8    (a) The General Assembly finds that a safe and civil 9school environment is necessary for students to learn and 10achieve and that bullying causes physical, psychological, and 11emotional harm to students and interferes with students' 12ability to learn and participate in school activities. The 13General Assembly further finds that bullying has been linked 14to other forms of antisocial behavior, such as vandalism, 15shoplifting, skipping and dropping out of school, fighting, 16using drugs and alcohol, sexual harassment, and sexual 17violence. Because of the negative outcomes associated with 18bullying in schools, the General Assembly finds that school 19districts, charter schools, and non-public, non-sectarian 20elementary and secondary schools should educate students, 21parents, and school district, charter school, or non-public, 22non-sectarian elementary or secondary school personnel about 23what behaviors constitute prohibited bullying.  HB1411 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 07636 LNS 17680 b1    Bullying on the basis of actual or perceived race, color, 2religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, physical appearance, 3socioeconomic status, academic status, pregnancy, parenting 4status, homelessness, age, marital status, physical or mental 5disability, military status, sexual orientation, 6gender-related identity or expression, unfavorable discharge 7from military service, association with a person or group with 8one or more of the aforementioned actual or perceived 9characteristics, or any other distinguishing characteristic is 10prohibited in all school districts, charter schools, and 11non-public, non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools. No 12student shall be subjected to bullying:13        (1) during any school-sponsored education program or 14    activity;15        (2) while in school, on school property, on school 16    buses or other school vehicles, at designated school bus 17    stops waiting for the school bus, or at school-sponsored 18    or school-sanctioned events or activities;19        (3) through the transmission of information from a 20    school computer, a school computer network, or other 21    similar electronic school equipment; or 22        (4) through the transmission of information from a 23    computer that is accessed at a nonschool-related location, 24    activity, function, or program or from the use of 25    technology or an electronic device that is not owned, 26    leased, or used by a school district or school if the   HB1411 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 07636 LNS 17680 b1    bullying causes a substantial disruption to the 2    educational process or orderly operation of a school. This 3    item (4) applies only in cases in which a school 4    administrator or teacher receives a report that bullying 5    through this means has occurred and does not require a 6    district or school to staff or monitor any 7    nonschool-related activity, function, or program. 8    (a-5) Nothing in this Section is intended to infringe upon 9any right to exercise free expression or the free exercise of 10religion or religiously based views protected under the First 11Amendment to the United States Constitution or under Section 3 12of Article I of the Illinois Constitution. 13    (b) In this Section: 14    "Bullying" includes "cyber-bullying" and means any severe 15or pervasive physical or verbal act or conduct, including 16communications made in writing or electronically, directed 17toward a student or students that has or can be reasonably 18predicted to have the effect of one or more of the following:19        (1) placing the student or students in reasonable fear 20    of harm to the student's or students' person or property;21        (2) causing a substantially detrimental effect on the 22    student's or students' physical or mental health;23        (3) substantially interfering with the student's or 24    students' academic performance; or25        (4) substantially interfering with the student's or 26    students' ability to participate in or benefit from the   HB1411 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 07636 LNS 17680 b1    services, activities, or privileges provided by a school.2    Bullying, as defined in this subsection (b), may take 3various forms, including without limitation one or more of the 4following: harassment, threats, intimidation, stalking, 5physical violence, sexual harassment, sexual violence, theft, 6public humiliation, destruction of property, or retaliation 7for asserting or alleging an act of bullying. This list is 8meant to be illustrative and non-exhaustive.9    "Cyber-bullying" means bullying through the use of 10technology or any electronic communication, including without 11limitation any transfer of signs, signals, writing, images, 12sounds, data, or intelligence of any nature transmitted in 13whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic system, 14photoelectronic system, or photooptical system, including 15without limitation electronic mail, Internet communications, 16instant messages, or facsimile communications. 17"Cyber-bullying" includes the creation of a webpage or weblog 18in which the creator assumes the identity of another person or 19the knowing impersonation of another person as the author of 20posted content or messages if the creation or impersonation 21creates any of the effects enumerated in the definition of 22bullying in this Section. "Cyber-bullying" also includes the 23distribution by electronic means of a communication to more 24than one person or the posting of material on an electronic 25medium that may be accessed by one or more persons if the 26distribution or posting creates any of the effects enumerated   HB1411 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 07636 LNS 17680 b1in the definition of bullying in this Section. 2    "Policy on bullying" means a bullying prevention policy 3that meets the following criteria:4        (1) Includes the bullying definition provided in this 5    Section.6        (2) Includes a statement that bullying is contrary to 7    State law and the policy of the school district, charter 8    school, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or 9    secondary school and is consistent with subsection (a-5) 10    of this Section.11        (3) Includes procedures for promptly reporting 12    bullying, including, but not limited to, identifying and 13    providing the school e-mail address (if applicable) and 14    school telephone number for the staff person or persons 15    responsible for receiving such reports and a procedure for 16    anonymous reporting; however, this shall not be construed 17    to permit formal disciplinary action solely on the basis 18    of an anonymous report.19        (4) Consistent with federal and State laws and rules 20    governing student privacy rights, includes procedures for 21    informing parents or guardians of all students involved in 22    the alleged incident of bullying within 24 hours after the 23    school's administration is made aware of the students' 24    involvement in the incident and discussing, as 25    appropriate, the availability of social work services, 26    counseling, school psychological services, other   HB1411 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 07636 LNS 17680 b1    interventions, and restorative measures. The school shall 2    make diligent efforts to notify a parent or legal 3    guardian, utilizing all contact information the school has 4    available or that can be reasonably obtained by the school 5    within the 24-hour period. 6        (5) Contains procedures for promptly investigating and 7    addressing reports of bullying, including the following:8            (A) Making all reasonable efforts to complete the 9        investigation within 10 school days after the date the 10        report of the incident of bullying was received and 11        taking into consideration additional relevant 12        information received during the course of the 13        investigation about the reported incident of bullying.14            (B) Involving appropriate school support personnel 15        and other staff persons with knowledge, experience, 16        and training on bullying prevention, as deemed 17        appropriate, in the investigation process.18            (C) Notifying the principal or school 19        administrator or his or her designee of the report of 20        the incident of bullying as soon as possible after the 21        report is received.22            (D) Consistent with federal and State laws and 23        rules governing student privacy rights, providing 24        parents and guardians of the students who are parties 25        to the investigation information about the 26        investigation and an opportunity to meet with the   HB1411 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 07636 LNS 17680 b1        principal or school administrator or his or her 2        designee to discuss the investigation, the findings of 3        the investigation, and the actions taken to address 4        the reported incident of bullying.5        (6) Includes the interventions that can be taken to 6    address bullying, which may include, but are not limited 7    to, school social work services, restorative measures, 8    social-emotional skill building, counseling, school 9    psychological services, and community-based services.10        (7) Includes a statement prohibiting reprisal or 11    retaliation against any person who reports an act of 12    bullying and the consequences and appropriate remedial 13    actions for a person who engages in reprisal or 14    retaliation.15        (8) Includes consequences and appropriate remedial 16    actions for a person found to have falsely accused another 17    of bullying as a means of retaliation or as a means of 18    bullying.19        (9) Is based on the engagement of a range of school 20    stakeholders, including students and parents or guardians.21        (10) Is posted on the school district's, charter 22    school's, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or 23    secondary school's existing, publicly accessible Internet 24    website, is included in the student handbook, and, where 25    applicable, posted where other policies, rules, and 26    standards of conduct are currently posted in the school   HB1411 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 07636 LNS 17680 b1    and provided periodically throughout the school year to 2    students and faculty, and is distributed annually to 3    parents, guardians, students, and school personnel, 4    including new employees when hired.5        (11) As part of the process of reviewing and 6    re-evaluating the policy under subsection (d) of this 7    Section, contains a policy evaluation process to assess 8    the outcomes and effectiveness of the policy that 9    includes, but is not limited to, factors such as the 10    frequency of victimization; student, staff, and family 11    observations of safety at a school; identification of 12    areas of a school where bullying occurs; the types of 13    bullying utilized; and bystander intervention or 14    participation. The school district, charter school, or 15    non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school 16    may use relevant data and information it already collects 17    for other purposes in the policy evaluation. The 18    information developed as a result of the policy evaluation 19    must be made available on the Internet website of the 20    school district, charter school, or non-public, 21    non-sectarian elementary or secondary school. If an 22    Internet website is not available, the information must be 23    provided to school administrators, school board members, 24    school personnel, parents, guardians, and students.25        (12) Is consistent with the policies of the school 26    board, charter school, or non-public, non-sectarian   HB1411 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 07636 LNS 17680 b1    elementary or secondary school.2        (13) Requires all individual instances of bullying, as 3    well as all threats, suggestions, or instances of 4    self-harm determined to be the result of bullying, to be 5    reported to the parents or legal guardians of those 6    involved under the guidelines provided in paragraph (4) of 7    this definition. 8    "Restorative measures" means a continuum of school-based 9alternatives to exclusionary discipline, such as suspensions 10and expulsions, that: (i) are adapted to the particular needs 11of the school and community, (ii) contribute to maintaining 12school safety, (iii) protect the integrity of a positive and 13productive learning climate, (iv) teach students the personal 14and interpersonal skills they will need to be successful in 15school and society, (v) serve to build and restore 16relationships among students, families, schools, and 17communities, (vi) reduce the likelihood of future disruption 18by balancing accountability with an understanding of students' 19behavioral health needs in order to keep students in school, 20and (vii) increase student accountability if the incident of 21bullying is based on religion, race, ethnicity, or any other 22category that is identified in the Illinois Human Rights Act. 23    "School personnel" means persons employed by, on contract 24with, or who volunteer in a school district, charter school, 25or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school, 26including without limitation school and school district   HB1411 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 07636 LNS 17680 b1administrators, teachers, school social workers, school 2counselors, school psychologists, school nurses, cafeteria 3workers, custodians, bus drivers, school resource officers, 4and security guards. 5    (c) (Blank). 6    (d) Each school district, charter school, and non-public, 7non-sectarian elementary or secondary school shall create, 8maintain, and implement a policy on bullying, which policy 9must be filed with the State Board of Education. The policy on 10bullying shall be based on the State Board of Education's 11template for a model bullying prevention policy under 12subsection (h) and shall include the criteria set forth in the 13definition of "policy on bullying". The policy or implementing 14procedure shall include a process to investigate whether a 15reported act of bullying is within the permissible scope of 16the district's or school's jurisdiction and shall require that 17the district or school provide the victim with information 18regarding services that are available within the district and 19community, such as counseling, support services, and other 20programs. School personnel available for help with a bully or 21to make a report about bullying shall be made known to parents 22or legal guardians, students, and school personnel. Every 2 23years, each school district, charter school, and non-public, 24non-sectarian elementary or secondary school shall conduct a 25review and re-evaluation of its policy and make any necessary 26and appropriate revisions. No later than September 30 of the   HB1411 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 07636 LNS 17680 b1subject year, the policy must be filed with the State Board of 2Education after being updated. The State Board of Education 3shall monitor and provide technical support for the 4implementation of policies created under this subsection (d). 5In monitoring the implementation of the policies, the State 6Board of Education shall review each filed policy on bullying 7to ensure all policies meet the requirements set forth in this 8Section, including ensuring that each policy meets the 12 9criterion identified within the definition of "policy on 10bullying" set forth in this Section. 11    If a school district, charter school, or non-public, 12non-sectarian elementary or secondary school fails to file a 13policy on bullying by September 30 of the subject year, the 14State Board of Education shall provide a written request for 15filing to the school district, charter school, or non-public, 16non-sectarian elementary or secondary school. If a school 17district, charter school, or non-public, non-sectarian 18elementary or secondary school fails to file a policy on 19bullying within 14 days of receipt of the aforementioned 20written request, the State Board of Education shall publish 21notice of the non-compliance on the State Board of Education's 22website. 23    Each school district, charter school, and non-public, 24non-sectarian elementary or secondary school may provide 25evidence-based professional development and youth programming 26on bullying prevention that is consistent with the provisions   HB1411 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 07636 LNS 17680 b1of this Section. 2    (e) This Section shall not be interpreted to prevent a 3victim from seeking redress under any other available civil or 4criminal law. 5    (f) School districts, charter schools, and non-public, 6non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools shall collect, 7maintain, and submit to the State Board of Education 8non-identifiable data regarding verified allegations of 9bullying within the school district, charter school, or 10non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school. 11School districts, charter schools, and non-public, 12non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools must submit 13such data in an annual report due to the State Board of 14Education no later than August 15 of each year starting with 15the 2024-2025 school year through the 2030-2031 school year. 16The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the 17submission of data that includes, but is not limited to: (i) a 18record of each verified allegation of bullying and action 19taken; and (ii) whether the instance of bullying was based on 20actual or perceived characteristics identified in subsection 21(a) and, if so, lists the relevant characteristics. The rules 22for the submission of data shall be consistent with federal 23and State laws and rules governing student privacy rights, 24including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational 25Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 and the Illinois School Student 26Records Act, which shall include, without limitation, a record   HB1411 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 07636 LNS 17680 b1of each complaint and action taken. The State Board of 2Education shall adopt rules regarding the notification of 3school districts, charter schools, and non-public, 4non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools that fail to 5comply with the requirements of this subsection. 6    (g) Upon the request of a parent or legal guardian of a 7child enrolled in a school district, charter school, or 8non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school 9within this State, the State Board of Education must provide 10non-identifiable data on the number of bullying allegations 11and incidents in a given year in the school district, charter 12school, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary 13school to the requesting parent or legal guardian. The State 14Board of Education shall adopt rules regarding (i) the 15handling of such data, (ii) maintaining the privacy of the 16students and families involved, and (iii) best practices for 17sharing numerical data with parents and legal guardians. 18    (h) By January 1, 2024, the State Board of Education shall 19post on its Internet website a template for a model bullying 20prevention policy.21    (i) The Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying Prevention 22Fund is created as a special fund in the State treasury. Any 23moneys appropriated to the Fund may be used, subject to 24appropriation, by the State Board of Education for the 25purposes of subsection (j). 26    (j) Subject to appropriation, the State Superintendent of   HB1411 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 07636 LNS 17680 b1Education may provide a grant to a school district, charter 2school, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary 3school to support its anti-bullying programming. Grants may be 4awarded from the Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying 5Prevention Fund. School districts, charter schools, and 6non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary schools that 7are not in compliance with subsection (f) are not eligible to 8receive a grant from the Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying 9Prevention Fund.10    (k) If a school district distributes materials on bullying 11to students, the materials must be age and developmentally 12appropriate. 13(Source: P.A. 102-197, eff. 7-30-21; 102-241, eff. 8-3-21; 14102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-894, eff. 5-20-22; 103-47, eff. 156-9-23.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 172025.